src/morphology/phonology-vh.twolc
!! =================================== !
!! The Somali VH morphophonological file !
!! =================================== !

! Notes:
!  If forms disappear but the rule should work, make sure
!  that the pair transforming exists in the Alphabet

Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z ' C
 ä       ë       ï           ö           ü
 á 	     é       í           ó           ú       ý
 %+Back %+Front 
! aa ee ii oo uu 
! ää ëë ïï öö üü


 ! a:ä
 ! u:ü
 ! i:ï
 ! o:ö
 ! e:ë
 %{#%}:0
!
! aa:ää
! ii:ïï
! uu:üü
! ee:ëë
! oo:öö
 ; 

!Diacritics
!  @V1@ @V2@ @V3A@ @V3B@ ; 

Sets

 ! Phonological sets
 Vowels = a e i o u ä ë ï ö ü ; !aa ää ïï ii uu üü ee ëë oo öö; 
 BackV = a e i o u ; ! aa ee ii oo uu ;
 FrontV = ä ë ï ö ü ; ! ää ëë ïï öö üü ; 

 Cons = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x y z ;
 
 Back = c x h ' q ;
 Approximants = w y ;

 ! Phonotactical sets

 Dummy = %+Back %+Front ; ! other verb classes here?


 WordChars = a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z '
			á é í ó ú ý ä ë ï ö ü ! aa ee ii oo uu ää ëë ïï öö üü
		    ; 

Definitions
! WordBoundary = [ %{##%}: | %{#%}: | %>: | %>:0 ] ; ! ## causes error
 WordBoundary = [%{#%}: | %>: | %>:0 ] ;
 MorphBoundary = [ %{#%}: ] ;


Rules
"VH must match"
 Vb:Vb <=> _ ([WordChars]+) Vb ;
		  Vb ([WordChars]+) _ ;
   where Vb in BackV ;

! urur -> urur, ürür


"VH spreads"
 Vb:Vf <=> _ ([WordChars]+) FrontV ;
		   FrontV ([WordChars]+) _ ;
	where Vb in BackV 
          Vf in FrontV
    matched ; 

! also want only the following outcome
! e.g., only spreading
! wanaagsanyahäy -> wänäägsänyähäy 


! TODO: fix this. everything works except here.
! ururkii
! ururkii ürürkïï
! ururkii ürürkii
! ururkii ururkïï
! ururkii ururkii



! TODO: stop at clitic boundaries {#k}? Need to have {#k} survive in output
! and then strip it here. 


! wanaagsan{#}yähay
! --> wanaagsan{#}yähäy

! TODO: combine with lexc transducer. 
! problem appears to be that although i get the correct output with strings, it's perhaps going the opposite direction

! urur
! urur    ürür
! urur    urur
! 
! wanaagsanyahay
! wanaagsanyahay  wänäägsänyähäy
! wanaagsanyahay  wanaagsanyahay
! 
! wänäägsänyähäy
! wänäägsänyähäy  wänäägsänyähäy

! in order for lookups to work, although we get surface forms the correct way, a must be the same as ä and ä must be the same as a.
